Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5312.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 17-8-1, 17-8-2 and 17-8-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-8
entitled "Local Canvassing Authorities" are hereby amended to read as follows:
17-8-1. Appointment of bipartisan authority.
(a) The legislative body of each city and town shall appoint a bipartisan canvassing
authority of three (3) qualified electors of the city or town, not more than two (2) of whom shall
belong to the same political party, and may shall appoint two (2) alternate members, not more than
one of whom shall belong to the same political party. At any meeting of the canvassing authority
at which a member is to be absent, the member may request that an alternate replace him or her for
that meeting; provided, that the alternate member must be of the same political party as the member.
The mayor, in cities and towns that elect a mayor, or the president of the town council, in cities and
towns with no elected mayor, shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of lists, nominate the members
of the canvassing authority from lists of party voters submitted by the respective chairpersons of
the city or town political committee, which lists shall contain the names of five (5) times the number
of persons to be appointed. If the legislative body refuses to approve the nomination of any person
to the canvassing authority, the mayor or the president shall submit to the legislative body, within
thirty (30) days of the refusal, another person named on one of the lists, and so on until a person is
appointed. If the chairperson of the city or town committee of a political party entitled to an
appointment fails or refuses to submit a list, within thirty (30) days of notice of a vacancy, the
mayor or the council president, as the case may be, shall nominate any party voter of the political

party entitled to the appointment.
(b) In any instance, in which a vacancy occurs and the remaining two (2) members of the
canvassing authority each belong to different political parties, the respective chairpersons of any
recognized city or town political party committee that has duly filed a biennial organization with
the canvassing authority, in accordance with § 17-12-9, shall each be entitled to submit a list, and
the mayor or the council president, as the case may be, shall nominate any party voter from any of
the submitted lists, in accordance with the procedures of subsection (a) of this section.
17-8-2. Term and qualifications for office.
(a) Each member of a local canvassing authority shall be appointed to serve for a term of
six (6) years beginning on the first Monday of March succeeding the date of his or her appointment
and until his or her successor is elected and qualified. No person shall be appointed or serve as a
member of the authority who is an officer or employee of the United States or of this state, or who
is an officer or employee of the authority’s city or town; provided, that in any city a member of the
authority may be employed as its clerk. Any member of the authority who becomes a candidate for
election to any public office and who fails to file a declination of the candidacy within the time
allowed by law shall be disqualified from holding membership upon the authority and his or her
successor shall be immediately elected.
(b) The fixed six (6) year terms of members of a local canvassing authority, shall expire on
a staggered basis on the first Monday of March in odd-numbered years; provided that, not more
than one member's term, shall expire in any odd-numbered year. If the term expiration dates on
record for any canvassing authority members are found to be in noncompliance with the provisions
of this section, the town or city clerk shall immediately correct them.
(c) The fixed six (6) year terms of alternates of a local canvassing authority shall expire on
the first Monday of March in any odd-numbered year.
17-8-5. Local boards — Powers and duties — Quorum.
(a) Each canvassing authority shall have and exercise the functions, powers, and duties
provided for local boards by this title or by any law not inconsistent with this title. It shall:
(1) Select one of its members as presiding officer and another as clerk of the board;
provided, that nothing in this title shall be deemed to affect the powers and duties of the town clerk
who shall be ex officio the clerk of the respective town canvassing authorities; and provided,
further, that in the cities of Pawtucket, Central Falls, Newport, Woonsocket, Cranston, and
Warwick, the clerk shall be designated at the time of his or her election or appointment;
(2) Have and discharge all of the functions, powers, and duties of the town council
concerning nominations, elections, registration of voters and canvassing rights, the preparing and
LC001204 - Page 2 of 4

correcting of voting lists, and other related matters, which powers are transferred to the local board;
(3) Make or furnish all returns or other things required by law to be made or furnished to
or by city clerks, boards of canvassers, and district clerks, relative to any matter within the purview
of this title;
(4) Appoint and employ all its necessary clerical and technical assistants and fix the
compensation of each person appointed, within the limits of funds available to it pursuant to law;
provided, that in the cities of Cranston and Woonsocket and the town of Coventry the employment
and compensation shall be subject to the approval of the respective city or town councils;
(5) The town or city clerk, or designee, in municipalities where the town or city clerk is by
law, charter, or ordinance charged with the functions of election administration, shall be the chief
local election official, primary administrative contact, and liaison from the canvassing authority
and local board to the secretary of state and to the state board of elections, except in towns and
cities where an election office, separate from the town or city clerk, is charged with election
administration, said chief local election official shall be designated by the local board and shall
hold the same duties. The chief local election official, upon taking office as city or town clerk, or
upon designation by the local board, as the case may be, shall designate an alternate local election
official, and shall at all times provide and maintain emergency contact information for, at minimum,
the chief local election official, the alternate local election official, and the chairperson of the board
of canvassers on file with the secretary of state and state board of elections; and
(6) The chief local election official shall, under the direction of the local board, have the
authority to coordinate with the secretary of state to add, modify, or revoke access to the statewide
central voter register for any system users in the municipality, who require it in order to carry out
the duties imposed on the canvassing authority by this title.
(b) A quorum of a local board for the purpose of receiving registrations shall be comprised
of one member of the board, and for all other purposes a quorum shall be comprised of two (2)
members.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001204
========
LC001204 - Page 3 of 4